Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-210 Termination of guardianship;
other proceedings after appointment. (a) A guardianship of a minor
terminates upon the minor's death, adoption, emancipation or attainment of
majority, or as ordered by the court.

(b) A ward or a person interested in the
welfare of a ward may petition for any order that is in the best interest of
the ward. The petitioner shall give notice of the hearing on the petition to
the ward, if the ward has attained fourteen years of age and is not the
petitioner, the guardian, and any other person as ordered by the court. [L
2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next